Maryland, session 2025, HB1332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–251.
PROPERTY IS NOT SUBJECT TO PROPERTY TAX IF THE PROPERTY IS:
(1) OWNED BY THE GLENSTONE FOUNDATION, INC.; AND
(2) USED EXCLUSIVELY FOR:
(I) THE STORAGE OF ART, ART HANDLING EQUIPMENT, OR
EXHIBITION SUPPLIES;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1332*

HOUSE BILL 1332
(II) GARDENS, MEADOWS, WILDLIFE HABITATS, OR FOREST
PRESERVES THAT SUPPORT ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION; OR
(III) HOUSING FOR EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING CARETAKERS,
SECURITY PERSONNEL, OR CONSERVATORS, WHO ARE ESSENTIAL TO MUSEUM
OPERATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.